Washington statutes.
RCW 6.15.050

Exemptions under RCW 6.15.010—Limitations on exemptions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5651-S2.SL) ***

(1) Wages, salary, or other compensation regularly paid for personal services rendered by the debtor claiming the exemption shall not be claimed as exempt under RCW 6.15.010, but the same may be claimed as exempt in any bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding to the same extent as allowed under the statutes relating to garnishments.

(2) No property may be exempt under RCW 6.15.010 from execution, attachment, or garnishment issued upon a judgment for all or any part of the purchase price of the property.

(3) No property may be exempt under RCW 6.15.010 from legal process issued upon a judgment for restitution ordered by a court to be paid for the benefit of a victim of a criminal act.

(4) No property may be exempt under RCW 6.15.010 from legal process issued upon a judgment for any tax levied upon such property.

(5) Nothing in this chapter shall be so construed as to prevent a debtor from creating a security interest in personal property which might be claimed as exempt, or the enforcement of such security interest against the property.

(6) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to exempt personal property of a nonresident of this state or of an individual who has left or is about to leave this state with the intention to defraud his or her creditors.

(7) Personal property exemptions are waived by failure to claim them prior to sale of exemptible property under execution or, in a garnishment proceeding, within the time specified in RCW 6.27.160.

(8) Personal property exemptions may not be claimed by one spouse in a bankruptcy case that is not a joint case or a joint administration of the estate with the bankruptcy estate of the other spouse where (a) bankruptcy is filed by both spouses within a six-month period, and (b) one spouse exempts property from property of the estate under the bankruptcy exemption provisions of 11 U.S.C. Sec. 522(d).

(9) No property may be exempt under RCW 6.15.010 from execution, levy, attachment, or garnishment issued by or on behalf of a child support agency operating under Title IV-D of the federal social security act or by or on behalf of any agent or assignee of the child support agency.

[ 2002 c 265 s 2; 1987 c 442 s 305; 1981 c 149 s 2; 1927 c 136 s 1; Code 1881 s 348; 1877 p 74 s 352; 1869 p 88 s 344; RRS s 571. Formerly RCW 6.16.080.]